Georgia, session 2025_26, HB739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
7 SECTION 1.
8 An Act providing a new charter for the City of Lawrenceville, approved May 4, 2017
9 (Ga. L. 2017, p. 3904), as amended, is amended in Section 1.02 by adding a new subsection
10 to read as follows:
11 "(c)(1) The corporate limits of the City of Lawrenceville shall also include the parcels
12 of land and area described in Appendix A attached to and made a part of this Act.
13 (2) Reserved."
H. B. 739
- 1 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
14 SECTION 2.
15 The election superintendent of Gwinnett County shall call and conduct a special election as
16 provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the territory
17 sought to be annexed into the City of Lawrenceville under this Act for approval or rejection.
18 The election superintendent shall conduct such election on the date of the 2026 general
19 primary election, and shall issue the call and conduct such election as provided by general
20 law. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be
21 published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official
22 organ of Gwinnett County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
23 "( ) YES Shall the Act which annexes certain land into the City of Lawrenceville be
24 ( ) NO approved?"
25 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the annexation shall vote "Yes," and all persons
26 desiring to vote for rejection of the annexation shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the
27 votes cast on such question are for approval of the annexation, then this Act shall become
28 effective on December 31, 2026. If more than one-half of the votes cast on such question are
29 for rejection of the annexation, this Act shall not become effective and shall be automatically
30 repealed on the first day of July immediately following such election date. Any additional
31 expense of adding this referendum to such election shall be borne by the City of
32 Lawrenceville. It shall be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to
33 the Secretary of State.
34 SECTION 3.
35 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 739
- 2 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
36 APPENDIX A
37 All that area designated as "Proposed Annexation Area" and shown in red on the map entitled
38 "Proposed Annexations," dated February 9, 2025, said map being attached as Exhibit "A" to
39 Resolution RES-2025-3, entitled "Resolution for Legislative Annexation," adopted by the
40 City Council of the City of Lawrenceville on February 12, 2025. Said area is intended, and
41 is hereby declared, to include the following tax parcels as identified in the records of the
42 Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on February 12, 2025:
43 R5078 003 R5080 220 R5080 244 R5080 276 R5080 300
44 R5079 013 R5080 221 R5080 245 R5080 277 R5080 301
45 R5079 013B R5080 222 R5080 246 R5080 278 R5080 302
46 R5079 025 R5080 223 R5080 247 R5080 279 R5080 303
47 R5079 075 R5080 224 R5080 248 R5080 280 R5080 304
48 R5079 114 R5080 225 R5080 249 R5080 281 R5080 305
49 R5079 116 R5080 226 R5080 250 R5080 282 R5080 306
50 R5079 129 R5080 227 R5080 251 R5080 283 R5080 307
51 R5079 131 R5080 228 R5080 252 R5080 284 R5080 308
52 R5079 137 R5080 229 R5080 253 R5080 285 R5080 309
53 R5079 285 R5080 230 R5080 254 R5080 286 R5080 310
54 R5080 002 R5080 231 R5080 256 R5080 287 R5080 311
55 R5080 003 R5080 232 R5080 257 R5080 288 R5080 312
56 R5080 004 R5080 233 R5080 261 R5080 289 R5080 313
57 R5080 005 R5080 234 R5080 266 R5080 290 R5080 314
58 R5080 006 R5080 235 R5080 267 R5080 291 R5080 315
59 R5080 212 R5080 236 R5080 268 R5080 292 R5080 316
60 R5080 213 R5080 237 R5080 269 R5080 293 R5080 317
61 R5080 214 R5080 238 R5080 270 R5080 294 R5080 318
62 R5080 215 R5080 239 R5080 271 R5080 295 R5080 319
63 R5080 216 R5080 240 R5080 272 R5080 296 R5080 320
64 R5080 217 R5080 241 R5080 273 R5080 297 R5080 321
65 R5080 218 R5080 242 R5080 274 R5080 298 R5080 322
66 R5080 219 R5080 243 R5080 275 R5080 299 R5080 323
H. B. 739
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
67 R5080 324 R5080 363 R5080 402 R5080 439 R5080 475
68 R5080 325 R5080 364 R5080 403 R5080 440 R5080 476
69 R5080 326 R5080 365 R5080 404 R5080 441 R5080 477
70 R5080 327 R5080 366 R5080 405 R5080 442 R5080 478
71 R5080 328 R5080 367 R5080 406 R5080 443 R5080 479
72 R5080 329 R5080 368 R5080 407 R5080 444 R5080 480
73 R5080 330 R5080 369 R5080 408 R5080 445 R5080 481
74 R5080 331 R5080 370 R5080 409 R5080 446 R5080 483
75 R5080 332 R5080 371 R5080 410 R5080 447 R5080 484
76 R5080 333 R5080 372 R5080 411 R5080 448 R5080 485
77 R5080 334 R5080 373 R5080 412 R5080 449 R5080 486
78 R5080 335 R5080 374 R5080 413 R5080 450 R5080 487
79 R5080 336 R5080 375 R5080 414 R5080 451 R5080 488
80 R5080 337 R5080 376 R5080 415 R5080 452 R5080 489
81 R5080 338 R5080 377 R5080 416 R5080 453 R5080 490
82 R5080 339 R5080 378 R5080 417 R5080 454 R5080 491
83 R5080 340 R5080 379 R5080 418 R5080 455 R5080 493
84 R5080 341 R5080 380 R5080 419 R5080 456 R5080 495
85 R5080 342 R5080 381 R5080 420 R5080 457 R5080 496
86 R5080 343 R5080 382 R5080 421 R5080 458 R5080 497
87 R5080 344 R5080 383 R5080 422 R5080 459 R5080 498
88 R5080 345 R5080 384 R5080 423 R5080 460 R5080 499
89 R5080 346 R5080 388 R5080 424 R5080 461 R5080 500
90 R5080 347 R5080 389 R5080 425 R5080 462 R5080 501
91 R5080 348 R5080 390 R5080 427 R5080 463 R5080 502
92 R5080 349 R5080 391 R5080 428 R5080 464 R5080 503
93 R5080 350 R5080 392 R5080 429 R5080 465 R5080 504
94 R5080 351 R5080 393 R5080 430 R5080 466 R5080 505
95 R5080 352 R5080 394 R5080 431 R5080 467 R5080 506
96 R5080 353 R5080 395 R5080 432 R5080 468 R5080 507
97 R5080 354 R5080 396 R5080 433 R5080 469 R5080 508
98 R5080 355 R5080 397 R5080 434 R5080 470 R5080 509
99 R5080 356 R5080 398 R5080 435 R5080 471 R5080 510
100 R5080 360 R5080 399 R5080 436 R5080 472 R5080 511
101 R5080 361 R5080 400 R5080 437 R5080 473 R5080 512
102 R5080 362 R5080 401 R5080 438 R5080 474 R5080 513
H. B. 739
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
103 R5080 514 R5080 550 R5081 019 R5081 057 R5081 095
104 R5080 515 R5080 551 R5081 020 R5081 058 R5081 096
105 R5080 516 R5080 552 R5081 021 R5081 059 R5081 097
106 R5080 517 R5080 553 R5081 022 R5081 060 R5081 098
107 R5080 518 R5080 554 R5081 023 R5081 061 R5081 099
108 R5080 519 R5080 555 R5081 024 R5081 062 R5081 100
109 R5080 520 R5080 556 R5081 025 R5081 063 R5081 101
110 R5080 521 R5080 557 R5081 026 R5081 064 R5081 102
111 R5080 522 R5080 558 R5081 027 R5081 065 R5081 103
112 R5080 523 R5080 559 R5081 028 R5081 066 R5081 104
113 R5080 524 R5080 560 R5081 029 R5081 067 R5081 105
114 R5080 525 R5080 561 R5081 030 R5081 068 R5081 106
115 R5080 526 R5080 562 R5081 032 R5081 069 R5081 108
116 R5080 527 R5080 563 R5081 033 R5081 070 R5081 109
117 R5080 528 R5080 564 R5081 034 R5081 071 R5081 110
118 R5080 529 R5080 565 R5081 035 R5081 072 R5081 111
119 R5080 530 R5080 566 R5081 036 R5081 073 R5081 112
120 R5080 531 R5080 567 R5081 037 R5081 074 R5081 113
121 R5080 532 R5080 568 R5081 038 R5081 076 R5081 114
122 R5080 533 R5080 569 R5081 039 R5081 077 R5081 115
123 R5080 534 R5080 570 R5081 040 R5081 078 R5081 116
124 R5080 535 R5080 571 R5081 041 R5081 079 R5081 117
125 R5080 536 R5080 572 R5081 042 R5081 080 R5081 118
126 R5080 537 R5080 573 R5081 043 R5081 081 R5081 119
127 R5080 538 R5080 573A R5081 044 R5081 082 R5081 120
128 R5080 539 R5080 575 R5081 045 R5081 083 R5081 121
129 R5080 540 R5081 003 R5081 046 R5081 084 R5081 122
130 R5080 541 R5081 004 R5081 047 R5081 085 R5081 123
131 R5080 542 R5081 011 R5081 048 R5081 086 R5081 124
132 R5080 543 R5081 012 R5081 049 R5081 087 R5081 125
133 R5080 544 R5081 013 R5081 050 R5081 088 R5081 126
134 R5080 545 R5081 014 R5081 052 R5081 089 R5081 127
135 R5080 546 R5081 015 R5081 053 R5081 090 R5081 128
136 R5080 547 R5081 016 R5081 054 R5081 091 R5081 129
137 R5080 548 R5081 017 R5081 055 R5081 092 R5081 131
138 R5080 549 R5081 018 R5081 056 R5081 093 R5081 132
H. B. 739
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
139 R5081 135 R5081 177 R5081 216 R5081 254 R5081 291
140 R5081 136 R5081 178 R5081 217 R5081 255 R5081 292
141 R5081 137 R5081 179 R5081 218 R5081 256 R5081 293
142 R5081 138 R5081 180 R5081 219 R5081 257 R5081 294
143 R5081 139 R5081 181 R5081 220 R5081 258 R5081 295
144 R5081 140 R5081 182 R5081 221 R5081 259 R5081 296
145 R5081 143 R5081 183 R5081 222 R5081 260 R5081 297
146 R5081 144 R5081 184 R5081 223 R5081 261 R5081 298
147 R5081 145 R5081 185 R5081 224 R5081 262 R5081 299
148 R5081 146 R5081 186 R5081 225 R5081 263 R5081 300
149 R5081 147 R5081 187 R5081 226 R5081 264 R5081 301
150 R5081 148 R5081 188 R5081 227 R5081 265 R5081 302
151 R5081 149 R5081 189 R5081 228 R5081 266 R5081 303
152 R5081 150 R5081 190 R5081 229 R5081 267 R5081 304
153 R5081 151 R5081 191 R5081 230 R5081 268 R5081 305
154 R5081 152 R5081 192 R5081 231 R5081 269 R5081 306
155 R5081 153 R5081 193 R5081 232 R5081 270 R5081 307
156 R5081 154 R5081 194 R5081 233 R5081 271 R5081 308
157 R5081 155 R5081 195 R5081 234 R5081 272 R5081 309
158 R5081 156 R5081 196 R5081 235 R5081 273 R5081 310
159 R5081 157 R5081 197 R5081 236 R5081 274 R5081 311
160 R5081 158 R5081 198 R5081 237 R5081 275 R5081 312
161 R5081 159 R5081 199 R5081 238 R5081 276 R5081 313
162 R5081 160 R5081 201 R5081 239 R5081 277 R5081 314
163 R5081 161 R5081 202 R5081 240 R5081 278 R5081 315
164 R5081 162 R5081 203 R5081 241 R5081 279 R5081 316
165 R5081 163 R5081 204 R5081 242 R5081 280 R5081 317
166 R5081 164 R5081 206 R5081 243 R5081 281 R5081 318
167 R5081 165 R5081 208 R5081 244 R5081 283 R5081 319
168 R5081 170 R5081 209 R5081 246 R5081 284 R5081 320
169 R5081 171 R5081 210 R5081 248 R5081 285 R5081 321
170 R5081 172 R5081 211 R5081 249 R5081 286 R5081 322
171 R5081 173 R5081 212 R5081 250 R5081 287 R5081 324
172 R5081 174 R5081 213 R5081 251 R5081 288 R5081 325
173 R5081 175 R5081 214 R5081 252 R5081 289 R5081 326
174 R5081 176 R5081 215 R5081 253 R5081 290 R5081 327
H. B. 739
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
175 R5081 328 R5081 371 R5081 407 R5081 443 R5081 479
176 R5081 329 R5081 372 R5081 408 R5081 444 R5081 480
177 R5081 330 R5081 373 R5081 409 R5081 445 R5081 481
178 R5081 331 R5081 374 R5081 410 R5081 446 R5081 482
179 R5081 332 R5081 375 R5081 411 R5081 447 R5081 483
180 R5081 333 R5081 376 R5081 412 R5081 448 R5081 484
181 R5081 334 R5081 377 R5081 413 R5081 449 R5081 485
182 R5081 335 R5081 378 R5081 414 R5081 450 R5081 486
183 R5081 336 R5081 379 R5081 415 R5081 451 R5081 487
184 R5081 337 R5081 380 R5081 416 R5081 452 R5081 488
185 R5081 338 R5081 381 R5081 417 R5081 453 R5081 489
186 R5081 339 R5081 382 R5081 418 R5081 454 R5081 490
187 R5081 340 R5081 383 R5081 419 R5081 455 R5081 491
188 R5081 341 R5081 384 R5081 420 R5081 456 R5081 492
189 R5081 342 R5081 385 R5081 421 R5081 457 R5081 493
190 R5081 343 R5081 386 R5081 422 R5081 458 R5081 494
191 R5081 344 R5081 387 R5081 423 R5081 459 R5081 495
192 R5081 345 R5081 388 R5081 424 R5081 460 R5081 496
193 R5081 346 R5081 389 R5081 425 R5081 461 R5081 497
194 R5081 347 R5081 390 R5081 426 R5081 462 R5081 498
195 R5081 348 R5081 391 R5081 427 R5081 463 R5081 499
196 R5081 349 R5081 392 R5081 428 R5081 464 R5081 500
197 R5081 350 R5081 393 R5081 429 R5081 465 R5081 501
198 R5081 351 R5081 394 R5081 430 R5081 466 R5081 502
199 R5081 352 R5081 395 R5081 431 R5081 467 R5081 503
200 R5081 353 R5081 396 R5081 432 R5081 468 R5081 504
201 R5081 354 R5081 397 R5081 433 R5081 469 R5081 505
202 R5081 355 R5081 398 R5081 434 R5081 470 R5081 506
203 R5081 356 R5081 399 R5081 435 R5081 471 R5081 507
204 R5081 357 R5081 400 R5081 436 R5081 472 R5081 508
205 R5081 358 R5081 401 R5081 437 R5081 473 R5081 509
206 R5081 359 R5081 402 R5081 438 R5081 474 R5081 510
207 R5081 362 R5081 403 R5081 439 R5081 475 R5081 511
208 R5081 368 R5081 404 R5081 440 R5081 476 R5081 512
209 R5081 369 R5081 405 R5081 441 R5081 477 R5081 513
210 R5081 370 R5081 406 R5081 442 R5081 478 R5081 514
H. B. 739
- 7 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
211 R5081 515 R5082 049 R5082 086 R5082 123 R5082 160
212 R5081 516 R5082 050 R5082 087 R5082 124 R5082 161
213 R5081 517 R5082 051 R5082 088 R5082 125 R5082 162
214 R5081 519 R5082 052 R5082 089 R5082 126 R5082 163
215 R5082 001 R5082 053 R5082 090 R5082 127 R5082 164
216 R5082 003 R5082 054 R5082 091 R5082 128 R5082 165
217 R5082 005 R5082 055 R5082 092 R5082 129 R5082 166
218 R5082 006 R5082 056 R5082 093 R5082 130 R5082 167
219 R5082 009 R5082 057 R5082 094 R5082 131 R5082 168
220 R5082 010 R5082 058 R5082 095 R5082 132 R5082 169
221 R5082 018 R5082 059 R5082 096 R5082 133 R5082 170
222 R5082 020 R5082 060 R5082 097 R5082 134 R5082 171
223 R5082 025 R5082 061 R5082 098 R5082 135 R5082 172
224 R5082 026 R5082 062 R5082 099 R5082 137 R5082 173
225 R5082 027 R5082 063 R5082 100 R5082 138 R5082 174
226 R5082 028 R5082 064 R5082 101 R5082 139 R5082 175
227 R5082 029 R5082 066 R5082 102 R5082 140 R5082 176
228 R5082 030 R5082 067 R5082 103 R5082 141 R5082 182
229 R5082 031 R5082 068 R5082 104 R5082 142 R5082 184
230 R5082 032 R5082 069 R5082 105 R5082 143 R5082 195
231 R5082 033 R5082 070 R5082 107 R5082 144 R5082 197
232 R5082 034 R5082 071 R5082 108 R5082 145 R5082 199
233 R5082 035 R5082 072 R5082 109 R5082 146 R5082 200
234 R5082 036 R5082 073 R5082 110 R5082 147 R5082 201
235 R5082 037 R5082 074 R5082 111 R5082 148 R5082 202
236 R5082 038 R5082 075 R5082 112 R5082 149 R5082 203
237 R5082 039 R5082 076 R5082 113 R5082 150 R5082 204
238 R5082 040 R5082 077 R5082 114 R5082 151 R5082 205
239 R5082 041 R5082 078 R5082 115 R5082 152 R5082 206
240 R5082 042 R5082 079 R5082 116 R5082 153 R5082 207
241 R5082 043 R5082 080 R5082 117 R5082 154 R5082 208
242 R5082 044 R5082 081 R5082 118 R5082 155 R5082 209
243 R5082 045 R5082 082 R5082 119 R5082 156 R5082 210
244 R5082 046 R5082 083 R5082 120 R5082 157 R5082 211
245 R5082 047 R5082 084 R5082 121 R5082 158 R5082 212
246 R5082 048 R5082 085 R5082 122 R5082 159 R5082 213
H. B. 739
- 8 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
247 R5082 214 R5082 254 R5082 290 R5082 326 R5083 301
248 R5082 216 R5082 255 R5082 291 R5082 327 R5083 302
249 R5082 218 R5082 256 R5082 292 R5082 328 R5083 303
250 R5082 219 R5082 257 R5082 293 R5082 329 R5083 304
251 R5082 221 R5082 258 R5082 294 R5083 003 R5083 305
252 R5082 223 R5082 259 R5082 295 R5083 003A R5083 306
253 R5082 224 R5082 260 R5082 296 R5083 009 R5083 307
254 R5082 225 R5082 261 R5082 297 R5083 073 R5083 308
255 R5082 226 R5082 262 R5082 298 R5083 270 R5083 309
256 R5082 227 R5082 263 R5082 299 R5083 271 R5083 310
257 R5082 228 R5082 264 R5082 300 R5083 272 R5083 311
258 R5082 229 R5082 265 R5082 301 R5083 273 R5083 312
259 R5082 230 R5082 266 R5082 302 R5083 274 R5083 313
260 R5082 231 R5082 267 R5082 303 R5083 275 R5083 314
261 R5082 232 R5082 268 R5082 304 R5083 276 R5083 315
262 R5082 233 R5082 269 R5082 305 R5083 277 R5083 316
263 R5082 234 R5082 270 R5082 306 R5083 278 R5083 317
264 R5082 235 R5082 271 R5082 307 R5083 279 R5083 318
265 R5082 236 R5082 272 R5082 308 R5083 280 R5083 319
266 R5082 237 R5082 273 R5082 309 R5083 281 R5083 320
267 R5082 238 R5082 274 R5082 310 R5083 282 R5083 321
268 R5082 239 R5082 275 R5082 311 R5083 283 R5083 322
269 R5082 240 R5082 276 R5082 312 R5083 284 R5083 323
270 R5082 241 R5082 277 R5082 313 R5083 285 R5083 324
271 R5082 242 R5082 278 R5082 314 R5083 286 R5083 325
272 R5082 243 R5082 279 R5082 315 R5083 287 R5083 326
273 R5082 244 R5082 280 R5082 316 R5083 288 R5083 327
274 R5082 245 R5082 281 R5082 317 R5083 289 R5083 329
275 R5082 246 R5082 282 R5082 318 R5083 290 R5083 330
276 R5082 247 R5082 283 R5082 319 R5083 291 R5083 331
277 R5082 248 R5082 284 R5082 320 R5083 294 R5083 332
278 R5082 249 R5082 285 R5082 321 R5083 295 R5083 333
279 R5082 250 R5082 286 R5082 322 R5083 296 R5083 334
280 R5082 251 R5082 287 R5082 323 R5083 297 R5083 335
281 R5082 252 R5082 288 R5082 323A R5083 299 R5083 337
282 R5082 253 R5082 289 R5082 325 R5083 300 R5083 338
H. B. 739
- 9 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
283 R5083 339 R5083 376 R5083 413 R5083 457 R5083 493
284 R5083 340 R5083 377 R5083 415 R5083 458 R5083 494
285 R5083 341 R5083 378 R5083 416 R5083 459 R5083 495
286 R5083 342 R5083 379 R5083 417 R5083 460 R5083 497
287 R5083 343 R5083 380 R5083 418 R5083 461 R5083 498
288 R5083 344 R5083 381 R5083 419 R5083 462 R5084 024
289 R5083 345 R5083 382 R5083 420 R5083 463 R5084 025
290 R5083 346 R5083 383 R5083 421 R5083 464 R5084 026
291 R5083 347 R5083 384 R5083 422 R5083 465 R5084 027
292 R5083 348 R5083 385 R5083 423 R5083 466 R5084 028
293 R5083 349 R5083 386 R5083 424 R5083 467 R5084 029
294 R5083 350 R5083 387 R5083 425 R5083 468 R5084 030
295 R5083 351 R5083 388 R5083 426 R5083 469 R5084 039
296 R5083 352 R5083 389 R5083 427 R5083 470 R5084 281
297 R5083 353 R5083 390 R5083 428 R5083 471 R5084 440
298 R5083 354 R5083 391 R5083 436 R5083 472 R5084 441
299 R5083 355 R5083 392 R5083 437 R5083 473 R5084 442
300 R5083 356 R5083 393 R5083 438 R5083 474 R5084 444
301 R5083 357 R5083 394 R5083 439 R5083 475 R5084 445
302 R5083 358 R5083 395 R5083 440 R5083 476 R5084 446
303 R5083 359 R5083 396 R5083 441 R5083 477 R5084 447
304 R5083 360 R5083 397 R5083 442 R5083 478 R5084 448
305 R5083 361 R5083 398 R5083 443 R5083 479 R5084 449
306 R5083 362 R5083 399 R5083 444 R5083 480 R5084 450
307 R5083 363 R5083 400 R5083 445 R5083 481 R5084 451
308 R5083 364 R5083 401 R5083 446 R5083 482 R5084 452
309 R5083 365 R5083 402 R5083 447 R5083 483 R5084 453
310 R5083 366 R5083 403 R5083 448 R5083 484 R5084 454
311 R5083 367 R5083 404 R5083 449 R5083 485 R5084 455
312 R5083 368 R5083 405 R5083 450 R5083 486 R5084 456
313 R5083 369 R5083 406 R5083 451 R5083 487 R5084 457
314 R5083 371 R5083 407 R5083 452 R5083 488 R5084 458
315 R5083 372 R5083 408 R5083 453 R5083 489 R5084 459
316 R5083 373 R5083 409 R5083 454 R5083 490 R5084 460
317 R5083 374 R5083 410 R5083 455 R5083 491 R5084 461
318 R5083 375 R5083 411 R5083 456 R5083 492 R5084 462
H. B. 739
- 10 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
319 R5084 463 R5084 499 R5107 466 R5107 502 R5108 088
320 R5084 464 R5084 500 R5107 467 R5107 503 R5108 089
321 R5084 465 R5084 501 R5107 468 R5107 504 R5108 090
322 R5084 466 R5084 502 R5107 469 R5107 505 R5108 091
323 R5084 467 R5084 503 R5107 470 R5107 506 R5108 092
324 R5084 468 R5084 504 R5107 471 R5107 507 R5108 093
325 R5084 469 R5084 505 R5107 472 R5108 001A R5108 094
326 R5084 470 R5084 506 R5107 473 R5108 001B R5108 095
327 R5084 471 R5084 507 R5107 474 R5108 002 R5108 096
328 R5084 472 R5084 508 R5107 475 R5108 011 R5108 097
329 R5084 473 R5084 509 R5107 476 R5108 012 R5108 098
330 R5084 474 R5084 510 R5107 477 R5108 014 R5108 099
331 R5084 475 R5084 511 R5107 478 R5108 015 R5108 100
332 R5084 476 R5084 512 R5107 479 R5108 016 R5108 101
333 R5084 477 R5084 513 R5107 480 R5108 021 R5108 102
334 R5084 478 R5084 514 R5107 481 R5108 023 R5108 103
335 R5084 479 R5084 515 R5107 482 R5108 029 R5108 104
336 R5084 480 R5084 516 R5107 483 R5108 030 R5108 105
337 R5084 481 R5084 517 R5107 484 R5108 043 R5108 106
338 R5084 482 R5107 003 R5107 485 R5108 047 R5108 107
339 R5084 483 R5107 006 R5107 486 R5108 048 R5108 108
340 R5084 484 R5107 013 R5107 487 R5108 049 R5108 109
341 R5084 485 R5107 016 R5107 488 R5108 050 R5108 110
342 R5084 486 R5107 453 R5107 489 R5108 051 R5108 111
343 R5084 487 R5107 454 R5107 490 R5108 052 R5108 112
344 R5084 488 R5107 455 R5107 491 R5108 053 R5108 113
345 R5084 489 R5107 456 R5107 492 R5108 054 R5108 114
346 R5084 490 R5107 457 R5107 493 R5108 055 R5108 115
347 R5084 491 R5107 458 R5107 494 R5108 056 R5108 116
348 R5084 492 R5107 459 R5107 495 R5108 057 R5108 117
349 R5084 493 R5107 460 R5107 496 R5108 058 R5108 118
350 R5084 494 R5107 461 R5107 497 R5108 059 R5108 119
351 R5084 495 R5107 462 R5107 498 R5108 060 R5108 120
352 R5084 496 R5107 463 R5107 499 R5108 062 R5108 121
353 R5084 497 R5107 464 R5107 500 R5108 086 R5108 122
354 R5084 498 R5107 465 R5107 501 R5108 087 R5108 123
H. B. 739
- 11 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
355 R5108 124 R5108 167 R5108 203 R5108 376 R5109 472
356 R5108 125 R5108 168 R5108 204 R5108 377 R5109 473
357 R5108 126 R5108 169 R5108 205 R5108 378 R5109 474
358 R5108 127 R5108 170 R5108 206 R5108 379 R5109 475
359 R5108 128 R5108 171 R5108 207 R5108 380 R5109 476
360 R5108 129 R5108 172 R5108 208 R5108 381 R5109 477
361 R5108 130 R5108 173 R5108 209 R5108 382 R5109 478
362 R5108 131 R5108 174 R5108 210 R5108 383 R5109 479
363 R5108 132 R5108 175 R5108 211 R5108 384 R5109 480
364 R5108 133 R5108 176 R5108 212 R5108 385 R5109 481
365 R5108 134 R5108 177 R5108 213 R5108 386 R5109 483
366 R5108 135 R5108 178 R5108 214 R5108 387 R5109 484
367 R5108 136 R5108 179 R5108 215 R5108 388 R5109 485
368 R5108 137 R5108 180 R5108 216 R5108 389 R5109 486
369 R5108 138 R5108 181 R5108 217 R5108 390 R5109 487
370 R5108 139 R5108 182 R5108 218 R5108 391 R5109 488
371 R5108 140 R5108 183 R5108 219 R5108 392 R5109 489
372 R5108 141 R5108 184 R5108 220 R5108 393 R5109 490
373 R5108 142 R5108 185 R5108 358 R5108 394 R5109 492
374 R5108 143 R5108 186 R5108 359 R5108 395 R5109 493
375 R5108 144 R5108 187 R5108 360 R5108 396 R5109 494
376 R5108 145 R5108 188 R5108 361 R5108 397 R5109 495
377 R5108 146 R5108 189 R5108 362 R5108 398 R5109 496
378 R5108 147 R5108 190 R5108 363 R5108 399 R5109 497
379 R5108 148 R5108 191 R5108 364 R5108 400 R5109 498
380 R5108 149 R5108 192 R5108 365 R5108 401 R5109 499
381 R5108 150 R5108 193 R5108 366 R5108 402 R5109 500
382 R5108 151 R5108 194 R5108 367 R5108 403 R5109 501
383 R5108 152 R5108 195 R5108 368 R5108 404 R5109 502
384 R5108 153 R5108 196 R5108 369 R5108 405 R5109 503
385 R5108 154 R5108 197 R5108 370 R5108 406 R5109 504
386 R5108 155 R5108 198 R5108 371 R5108 407 R5109 505
387 R5108 163 R5108 199 R5108 372 R5108 415 R5109 506
388 R5108 164 R5108 200 R5108 373 R5108 417 R5109 507
389 R5108 165 R5108 201 R5108 374 R5108 418 R5109 508
390 R5108 166 R5108 202 R5108 375 R5109 471 R5109 509
H. B. 739
- 12 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
391 R5109 510 R5111 035 R5111 078 R5111 118 R5111 163
392 R5109 511 R5111 036 R5111 079 R5111 119 R5111 164
393 R5109 512 R5111 038 R5111 080 R5111 120 R5111 165
394 R5109 513 R5111 039 R5111 081 R5111 121 R5111 166
395 R5109 514 R5111 040 R5111 082 R5111 122 R5111 167
396 R5109 515 R5111 042 R5111 083 R5111 123 R5111 168
397 R5109 516 R5111 043 R5111 085 R5111 124 R5111 169
398 R5109 517 R5111 044 R5111 086 R5111 125 R5111 170
399 R5109 518 R5111 045 R5111 087 R5111 127 R5111 171
400 R5109 519 R5111 046 R5111 088 R5111 128 R5111 172
401 R5109 520 R5111 046A R5111 090 R5111 129 R5111 173
402 R5109 521 R5111 047 R5111 091 R5111 130 R5111 174
403 R5109 522 R5111 048 R5111 092 R5111 131 R5111 175
404 R5109 523 R5111 049 R5111 093 R5111 132 R5111 176
405 R5111 006 R5111 050 R5111 094 R5111 133 R5111 177
406 R5111 008B R5111 050A R5111 095 R5111 134 R5111 178
407 R5111 008D R5111 054 R5111 096 R5111 135 R5111 179
408 R5111 014 R5111 058 R5111 097 R5111 136 R5111 180
409 R5111 015 R5111 059 R5111 098 R5111 137 R5111 181
410 R5111 016 R5111 060 R5111 099 R5111 138 R5111 182
411 R5111 017 R5111 061 R5111 100 R5111 139 R5111 183
412 R5111 018 R5111 062 R5111 101 R5111 141 R5111 184
413 R5111 019 R5111 063 R5111 102 R5111 149 R5111 185
414 R5111 020 R5111 064 R5111 103 R5111 150 R5111 186
415 R5111 022 R5111 066 R5111 104 R5111 151 R5111 187
416 R5111 023 R5111 067 R5111 105 R5111 152 R5111 188
417 R5111 024 R5111 068 R5111 106 R5111 153 R5111 189
418 R5111 026 R5111 069 R5111 107 R5111 154 R5111 190
419 R5111 027 R5111 070 R5111 108 R5111 155 R5111 191
420 R5111 028 R5111 071 R5111 110 R5111 156 R5111 192
421 R5111 029 R5111 072 R5111 112 R5111 157 R5111 193
422 R5111 030 R5111 073 R5111 113 R5111 158 R5111 194
423 R5111 031 R5111 074 R5111 114 R5111 159 R5111 195
424 R5111 032 R5111 075 R5111 115 R5111 160 R5111 196
425 R5111 033 R5111 076 R5111 116 R5111 161 R5111 197
426 R5111 034 R5111 077 R5111 117 R5111 162 R5111 198
H. B. 739
- 13 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
427 R5111 199 R5111 236 R5111 279 R5112 017 R5112 054
428 R5111 200 R5111 237 R5111 280 R5112 018 R5112 055
429 R5111 201 R5111 238 R5111 281 R5112 019 R5112 056
430 R5111 202 R5111 239 R5111 282 R5112 020 R5112 057
431 R5111 204 R5111 240 R5111 284 R5112 021 R5112 058
432 R5111 205 R5111 241 R5111 285 R5112 022 R5112 059
433 R5111 206 R5111 248 R5111 286 R5112 023 R5112 060
434 R5111 207 R5111 250 R5111 287 R5112 024 R5112 061
435 R5111 208 R5111 251 R5111 288 R5112 025 R5112 062
436 R5111 209 R5111 252 R5111 289 R5112 026 R5112 063
437 R5111 210 R5111 253 R5111 290 R5112 027 R5112 064
438 R5111 211 R5111 254 R5111 291 R5112 028 R5112 065
439 R5111 212 R5111 255 R5111 292 R5112 029 R5112 066
440 R5111 213 R5111 256 R5111 293 R5112 030 R5112 067
441 R5111 214 R5111 257 R5111 294 R5112 031 R5112 068
442 R5111 215 R5111 258 R5111 295 R5112 032 R5112 069
443 R5111 216 R5111 259 R5111 296 R5112 033 R5112 070
444 R5111 217 R5111 260 R5111 297 R5112 034 R5112 071
445 R5111 218 R5111 261 R5111 298 R5112 035 R5112 072
446 R5111 219 R5111 262 R5111 299 R5112 036 R5112 073
447 R5111 220 R5111 263 R5111 300 R5112 037 R5112 074
448 R5111 221 R5111 264 R5111 301 R5112 038 R5112 075
449 R5111 222 R5111 265 R5111 302 R5112 039 R5112 076
450 R5111 223 R5111 266 R5111 303 R5112 041 R5112 077
451 R5111 224 R5111 267 R5111 304 R5112 042 R5112 078
452 R5111 225 R5111 268 R5111 305 R5112 043 R5112 080
453 R5111 226 R5111 269 R5111 306 R5112 044 R5112 081
454 R5111 227 R5111 270 R5111 307 R5112 045 R5112 082
455 R5111 228 R5111 271 R5112 009 R5112 046 R5112 083
456 R5111 229 R5111 272 R5112 010 R5112 047 R5112 084
457 R5111 230 R5111 273 R5112 011 R5112 048 R5112 085
458 R5111 231 R5111 274 R5112 012 R5112 049 R5112 086
459 R5111 232 R5111 275 R5112 013 R5112 050 R5112 087
460 R5111 233 R5111 276 R5112 014 R5112 051 R5112 088
461 R5111 234 R5111 277 R5112 015 R5112 052 R5112 089
462 R5111 235 R5111 278 R5112 016 R5112 053 R5112 090
H. B. 739
- 14 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
463 R5112 091 R5112 128 R5112 165 R5112 203 R5112 240
464 R5112 092 R5112 129 R5112 166 R5112 204 R5112 241
465 R5112 093 R5112 130 R5112 167 R5112 205 R5112 242
466 R5112 094 R5112 131 R5112 168 R5112 206 R5112 243
467 R5112 095 R5112 132 R5112 170 R5112 207 R5112 244
468 R5112 096 R5112 133 R5112 171 R5112 208 R5112 245
469 R5112 097 R5112 134 R5112 172 R5112 209 R5112 246
470 R5112 098 R5112 135 R5112 173 R5112 210 R5112 247
471 R5112 099 R5112 136 R5112 175 R5112 211 R5112 248
472 R5112 100 R5112 137 R5112 176 R5112 212 R5112 249
473 R5112 101 R5112 138 R5112 177 R5112 213 R5112 250
474 R5112 102 R5112 139 R5112 178 R5112 214 R5117 002
475 R5112 103 R5112 140 R5112 179 R5112 215 R5117 003
476 R5112 104 R5112 141 R5112 180 R5112 216 R5117 003A
477 R5112 105 R5112 142 R5112 181 R5112 217 R5117 004A
478 R5112 106 R5112 143 R5112 182 R5112 218 R5117 006
479 R5112 107 R5112 144 R5112 183 R5112 219 R5117 008
480 R5112 108 R5112 145 R5112 184 R5112 220 R5117 009
481 R5112 109 R5112 146 R5112 185 R5112 221 R5117 013
482 R5112 110 R5112 147 R5112 186 R5112 222 R5117 015
483 R5112 111 R5112 148 R5112 187 R5112 223 R5117 038
484 R5112 112 R5112 149 R5112 188 R5112 224 R5117 039
485 R5112 113 R5112 151 R5112 189 R5112 225 R5117 040
486 R5112 114 R5112 152 R5112 190 R5112 226 R5117 042
487 R5112 116 R5112 153 R5112 191 R5112 227 R5117 069
488 R5112 117 R5112 154 R5112 192 R5112 229 R5117 071
489 R5112 118 R5112 155 R5112 193 R5112 230 R5117 073
490 R5112 119 R5112 156 R5112 194 R5112 231 R5117 074
491 R5112 120 R5112 157 R5112 195 R5112 232 R5117 075
492 R5112 121 R5112 158 R5112 196 R5112 233 R5117 076
493 R5112 122 R5112 159 R5112 197 R5112 234 R5117 077
494 R5112 123 R5112 160 R5112 198 R5112 235 R5117 078
495 R5112 124 R5112 161 R5112 199 R5112 236 R5117 079
496 R5112 125 R5112 162 R5112 200 R5112 237 R5117 080
497 R5112 126 R5112 163 R5112 201 R5112 238 R5117 081
498 R5112 127 R5112 164 R5112 202 R5112 239 R5117 082
H. B. 739
- 15 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
499 R5117 083 R5117 122 R5117 158 R5117 201 R5117 237
500 R5117 084 R5117 123 R5117 159 R5117 202 R5117 238
501 R5117 085 R5117 124 R5117 160 R5117 203 R5117 239
502 R5117 086 R5117 125 R5117 161 R5117 204 R5117 240
503 R5117 087 R5117 126 R5117 162 R5117 205 R5117 241
504 R5117 088 R5117 127 R5117 163 R5117 206 R5117 242
505 R5117 089 R5117 128 R5117 164 R5117 207 R5117 243
506 R5117 090 R5117 129 R5117 165 R5117 208 R5117 244
507 R5117 091 R5117 130 R5117 166 R5117 209 R5117 245
508 R5117 092 R5117 131 R5117 167 R5117 210 R5117 246
509 R5117 093 R5117 132 R5117 168 R5117 211 R5117 247
510 R5117 094 R5117 133 R5117 169 R5117 212 R5117 248
511 R5117 095 R5117 134 R5117 171 R5117 213 R5117 249
512 R5117 096 R5117 135 R5117 178 R5117 214 R5117 250
513 R5117 097 R5117 136 R5117 179 R5117 215 R5117 251
514 R5117 098 R5117 137 R5117 180 R5117 216 R5117 252
515 R5117 099 R5117 138 R5117 181 R5117 217 R5117 253
516 R5117 100 R5117 139 R5117 182 R5117 218 R5117 254
517 R5117 101 R5117 140 R5117 183 R5117 219 R5117 255
518 R5117 102 R5117 141 R5117 184 R5117 220 R5117 256
519 R5117 104 R5117 142 R5117 185 R5117 221 R5117 257
520 R5117 105 R5117 143 R5117 186 R5117 222 R5117 258
521 R5117 106 R5117 144 R5117 187 R5117 223 R5117 259
522 R5117 107 R5117 145 R5117 188 R5117 224 R5117 260
523 R5117 108 R5117 146 R5117 189 R5117 225 R5117 261
524 R5117 109 R5117 147 R5117 190 R5117 226 R5117 262
525 R5117 110 R5117 148 R5117 191 R5117 227 R5117 263
526 R5117 111 R5117 149 R5117 192 R5117 228 R5117 264
527 R5117 112 R5117 150 R5117 193 R5117 229 R5117 265
528 R5117 113 R5117 151 R5117 194 R5117 230 R5117 273
529 R5117 114 R5117 152 R5117 195 R5117 231 R5117 274
530 R5117 116 R5117 153 R5117 196 R5117 232 R5117 275
531 R5117 118 R5117 154 R5117 197 R5117 233 R5117 276
532 R5117 119 R5117 155 R5117 198 R5117 234 R5117 277
533 R5117 120 R5117 156 R5117 199 R5117 235 R5117 278
534 R5117 121 R5117 157 R5117 200 R5117 236 R5117 279
H. B. 739
- 16 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
535 R5117 280 R5117 317 R5117 353 R5117 390 R5117 427
536 R5117 281 R5117 318 R5117 354 R5117 391 R5117 428
537 R5117 282 R5117 319 R5117 355 R5117 392 R5117 429
538 R5117 283 R5117 320 R5117 356 R5117 393 R5117 430
539 R5117 284 R5117 321 R5117 357 R5117 394 R5117 431
540 R5117 285 R5117 322 R5117 358 R5117 395 R5117 432
541 R5117 286 R5117 323 R5117 359 R5117 396 R5117 433
542 R5117 287 R5117 324 R5117 360 R5117 397 R5117 434
543 R5117 288 R5117 325 R5117 361 R5117 398 R5117 435
544 R5117 289 R5117 326 R5117 362 R5117 399 R5117 436
545 R5117 290 R5117 327 R5117 363 R5117 400 R5117 437
546 R5117 291 R5117 328 R5117 364 R5117 401 R5117 438
547 R5117 292 R5117 329 R5117 365 R5117 402 R5117 439
548 R5117 293 R5117 330 R5117 366 R5117 403 R5117 440
549 R5117 294 R5117 331 R5117 367 R5117 404 R5117 441
550 R5117 295 R5117 332 R5117 368 R5117 405 R5117 442
551 R5117 296 R5117 333 R5117 369 R5117 406 R5117 443
552 R5117 297 R5117 334 R5117 370 R5117 407 R5117 444
553 R5117 298 R5117 335 R5117 371 R5117 408 R5117 445
554 R5117 299 R5117 336 R5117 372 R5117 410 R5117 446
555 R5117 300 R5117 337 R5117 373 R5117 411 R5117 447
556 R5117 301 R5117 338 R5117 374 R5117 412 R5117 484
557 R5117 302 R5117 339 R5117 375 R5117 413 R5117 485
558 R5117 304 R5117 340 R5117 376 R5117 414 R5117 486
559 R5117 305 R5117 341 R5117 377 R5117 415 R5117 487
560 R5117 306 R5117 342 R5117 378 R5117 416 R5117 488
561 R5117 307 R5117 343 R5117 380 R5117 417 R5117 489
562 R5117 308 R5117 344 R5117 381 R5117 418 R5117 490
563 R5117 309 R5117 345 R5117 382 R5117 419 R5117 491
564 R5117 310 R5117 346 R5117 383 R5117 420 R5117 492
565 R5117 311 R5117 347 R5117 384 R5117 421 R5117 493
566 R5117 312 R5117 348 R5117 385 R5117 422 R5117 494
567 R5117 313 R5117 349 R5117 386 R5117 423 R5117 495
568 R5117 314 R5117 350 R5117 387 R5117 424 R5117 496
569 R5117 315 R5117 351 R5117 388 R5117 425 R5117 497
570 R5117 316 R5117 352 R5117 389 R5117 426 R5117 498
H. B. 739
- 17 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
571 R5117 499 R5117 537 R5118 003 R5139 011 R5139 048
572 R5117 500 R5117 538 R5118 004 R5139 012 R5139 049
573 R5117 502 R5117 539 R5118 005 R5139 013 R5139 050
574 R5117 503 R5117 542 R5118 006 R5139 014 R5139 051
575 R5117 504 R5117 543 R5118 007 R5139 015 R5139 052
576 R5117 505 R5117 544 R5118 008 R5139 016 R5139 053
577 R5117 506 R5117 545 R5118 009 R5139 017 R5139 054
578 R5117 507 R5117 546 R5118 010 R5139 018 R5139 055
579 R5117 508 R5117 547 R5118 011 R5139 019 R5139 056
580 R5117 509 R5117 548 R5118 012 R5139 020 R5139 057
581 R5117 510 R5117 549 R5118 013 R5139 021 R5139 058
582 R5117 511 R5117 550 R5118 014 R5139 022 R5139 059
583 R5117 512 R5117 551 R5118 015 R5139 023 R5139 060
584 R5117 513 R5117 552 R5118 016 R5139 024 R5139 061
585 R5117 514 R5117 553 R5118 017 R5139 025 R5139 062
586 R5117 515 R5117 554 R5118 018 R5139 026 R5139 063
587 R5117 516 R5117 555 R5118 019 R5139 027 R5139 064
588 R5117 517 R5117 556 R5118 020 R5139 028 R5139 065
589 R5117 518 R5117 557 R5118 021 R5139 029 R5139 066
590 R5117 519 R5117 558 R5118 022 R5139 030 R5139 067
591 R5117 520 R5117 559 R5118 031 R5139 031 R5139 068
592 R5117 522 R5117 560 R5118 033 R5139 032 R5139 069
593 R5117 523 R5117 561 R5118 034 R5139 033 R5139 070
594 R5117 524 R5117 562 R5118 036 R5139 034 R5139 071
595 R5117 525 R5117 563 R5118 038 R5139 035 R5139 072
596 R5117 526 R5117 564 R5118 039 R5139 036 R5139 073
597 R5117 527 R5117 565 R5118 040 R5139 037 R5139 074
598 R5117 528 R5117 566 R5118 041 R5139 038 R5139 075
599 R5117 529 R5117 567 R5118 042 R5139 039 R5139 076
600 R5117 530 R5117 568 R5118 043 R5139 040 R5139 077
601 R5117 531 R5117 569 R5118 044 R5139 041 R5139 078
602 R5117 532 R5117 570 R5118 045 R5139 042 R5139 079
603 R5117 533 R5117 571 R5118 046 R5139 044 R5139 080
604 R5117 534 R5117 572 R5139 002 R5139 045 R5139 081
605 R5117 535 R5117 573 R5139 008 R5139 046 R5139 082
606 R5117 536 R5117 574 R5139 010 R5139 047 R5139 083
H. B. 739
- 18 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
607 R5139 084 R5139 129 R5139 169 R5139 249 R5139 286
608 R5139 085 R5139 130 R5139 170 R5139 250 R5139 287
609 R5139 086 R5139 131 R5139 171 R5139 251 R5139 288
610 R5139 087 R5139 132 R5139 175 R5139 252 R5139 289
611 R5139 088 R5139 133 R5139 179 R5139 253 R5139 290
612 R5139 089 R5139 135 R5139 180 R5139 254 R5139 291
613 R5139 090 R5139 137 R5139 186 R5139 255 R5139 292
614 R5139 091 R5139 138 R5139 187 R5139 256 R5139 293
615 R5139 092 R5139 139 R5139 193 R5139 257 R5139 294
616 R5139 093 R5139 140 R5139 222 R5139 258 R5139 295
617 R5139 094 R5139 141 R5139 223 R5139 260 R5139 296
618 R5139 095 R5139 142 R5139 224 R5139 261 R5139 297
619 R5139 096 R5139 143 R5139 225 R5139 262 R5139 307
620 R5139 097 R5139 144 R5139 226 R5139 263 R5140 001A
621 R5139 098 R5139 145 R5139 227 R5139 264 R5140 002
622 R5139 099 R5139 146 R5139 228 R5139 265 R5140 007
623 R5139 100 R5139 147 R5139 229 R5139 266 R5140 008
624 R5139 101 R5139 149 R5139 230 R5139 267 R5140 009
625 R5139 102 R5139 150 R5139 231 R5139 268 R5140 010
626 R5139 103 R5139 151 R5139 232 R5139 269 R5140 011
627 R5139 104 R5139 153 R5139 233 R5139 270 R5140 012
628 R5139 105 R5139 154 R5139 234 R5139 271 R5140 013
629 R5139 106 R5139 155 R5139 235 R5139 272 R5140 015
630 R5139 107 R5139 156 R5139 236 R5139 273 R5140 016
631 R5139 108 R5139 157 R5139 237 R5139 274 R5140 017
632 R5139 109 R5139 158 R5139 238 R5139 275 R5140 018
633 R5139 119 R5139 159 R5139 239 R5139 276 R5140 018A
634 R5139 120 R5139 160 R5139 240 R5139 277 R5140 019
635 R5139 121 R5139 161 R5139 241 R5139 278 R5140 020
636 R5139 122 R5139 162 R5139 242 R5139 279 R5140 021
637 R5139 123 R5139 163 R5139 243 R5139 280 R5140 022
638 R5139 124 R5139 164 R5139 244 R5139 281 R5140 023
639 R5139 125 R5139 165 R5139 245 R5139 282 R5140 024
640 R5139 126 R5139 166 R5139 246 R5139 283 R5140 025
641 R5139 127 R5139 167 R5139 247 R5139 284 R5140 026
642 R5139 128 R5139 168 R5139 248 R5139 285 R5140 027
H. B. 739
- 19 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
643 R5140 028 R5140 069 R5140 114 R5140 152 R5140 203
644 R5140 029 R5140 070 R5140 115 R5140 153 R5140 204
645 R5140 030 R5140 071 R5140 116 R5140 154 R5140 205
646 R5140 033 R5140 072 R5140 117 R5140 155 R5140 206
647 R5140 035 R5140 073 R5140 118 R5140 156 R5140 207
648 R5140 036 R5140 074 R5140 119 R5140 157 R5140 208
649 R5140 037 R5140 076 R5140 120 R5140 171 R5140 209
650 R5140 038 R5140 077 R5140 123 R5140 172 R5140 210
651 R5140 039 R5140 078 R5140 124 R5140 173 R5140 211
652 R5140 040 R5140 079 R5140 125 R5140 174 R5140 212
653 R5140 041 R5140 081 R5140 126 R5140 175 R5140 213
654 R5140 042 R5140 082 R5140 127 R5140 176 R5140 214
655 R5140 043 R5140 083 R5140 128 R5140 177 R5140 216
656 R5140 044 R5140 084 R5140 129 R5140 179 R5140 217
657 R5140 045 R5140 085 R5140 130 R5140 181 R5140 218
658 R5140 046 R5140 086 R5140 131 R5140 182 R5140 219
659 R5140 047 R5140 087 R5140 132 R5140 183 R5140 220
660 R5140 048 R5140 088 R5140 133 R5140 184 R5140 221
661 R5140 050 R5140 089 R5140 134 R5140 185 R5140 222
662 R5140 051 R5140 090 R5140 135 R5140 186 R5140 223
663 R5140 052 R5140 091 R5140 136 R5140 187 R5140 224
664 R5140 054 R5140 092 R5140 137 R5140 188 R5140 225
665 R5140 055 R5140 093 R5140 138 R5140 189 R5140 226
666 R5140 056 R5140 094 R5140 139 R5140 190 R5140 227
667 R5140 057 R5140 095 R5140 140 R5140 191 R5140 228
668 R5140 058 R5140 097 R5140 141 R5140 192 R5140 229
669 R5140 059 R5140 098 R5140 142 R5140 193 R5140 230
670 R5140 060 R5140 099 R5140 143 R5140 194 R5140 232
671 R5140 061 R5140 105 R5140 144 R5140 195 R5140 233
672 R5140 062 R5140 106 R5140 145 R5140 196 R5140 234
673 R5140 063 R5140 107 R5140 146 R5140 197 R5140 235
674 R5140 064 R5140 108 R5140 147 R5140 198 R5140 236
675 R5140 065 R5140 109 R5140 148 R5140 199 R5140 237
676 R5140 066 R5140 111 R5140 149 R5140 200 R5140 238
677 R5140 067 R5140 112 R5140 150 R5140 201 R5140 239
678 R5140 068 R5140 113 R5140 151 R5140 202 R5140 240
H. B. 739
- 20 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
679 R5140 241 R5140 283 R5149 142 R5149 201 R5149 238
680 R5140 242 R5140 284 R5149 143 R5149 202 R5149 239
681 R5140 243 R5140 285 R5149 144 R5149 203 R5149 240
682 R5140 244 R5140 286 R5149 145 R5149 204 R5149 241
683 R5140 245 R5140 287 R5149 146 R5149 205 R5149 242
684 R5140 246 R5140 288 R5149 150 R5149 206 R5149 243
685 R5140 247 R5140 289 R5149 151 R5149 207 R5149 244
686 R5140 248 R5140 290 R5149 152 R5149 208 R5149 245
687 R5140 249 R5140 291 R5149 153 R5149 209 R5149 246
688 R5140 250 R5140 292 R5149 154 R5149 210 R5149 247
689 R5140 251 R5140 293 R5149 155 R5149 211 R5149 248
690 R5140 252 R5140 294 R5149 156 R5149 212 R5149 249
691 R5140 255 R5140 295 R5149 157 R5149 213 R5149 250
692 R5140 257 R5140 296 R5149 158 R5149 214 R5149 251
693 R5140 258 R5140 297 R5149 159 R5149 215 R5149 257
694 R5140 259 R5140 298 R5149 160 R5149 216 R5149 261
695 R5140 263 R5140 299 R5149 161 R5149 217 R5149 262
696 R5140 264 R5140 300 R5149 162 R5149 218 R5149 263
697 R5140 265 R5140 301 R5149 163 R5149 219 R5149 264
698 R5140 266 R5140 302 R5149 164 R5149 221 R5149 265
699 R5140 267 R5140 303 R5149 165 R5149 222 R5149 266
700 R5140 268 R5140 304 R5149 166 R5149 223 R5149 267
701 R5140 269 R5140 305 R5149 167 R5149 224 R5149 268
702 R5140 270 R5140 386 R5149 169 R5149 225 R5149 269
703 R5140 271 R5140 412 R5149 189 R5149 226 R5149 270
704 R5140 272 R5149 002 R5149 190 R5149 227 R5149 271
705 R5140 273 R5149 131 R5149 191 R5149 228 R5149 272
706 R5140 274 R5149 132 R5149 192 R5149 229 R5149 273
707 R5140 275 R5149 134 R5149 193 R5149 230 R5149 274
708 R5140 276 R5149 135 R5149 194 R5149 231 R5149 275
709 R5140 277 R5149 136 R5149 195 R5149 232 R5149 276
710 R5140 278 R5149 137 R5149 196 R5149 233 R5149 277
711 R5140 279 R5149 138 R5149 197 R5149 234 R5149 278
712 R5140 280 R5149 139 R5149 198 R5149 235 R5149 279
713 R5140 281 R5149 140 R5149 199 R5149 236 R5149 280
714 R5140 282 R5149 141 R5149 200 R5149 237 R5149 281
H. B. 739
- 21 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
715 R5149 282 R5149 350 R5149 386 R5171 044 R5171 214
716 R5149 283 R5149 351 R5149 387 R5171 045 R5171 215
717 R5149 284 R5149 352 R5149 388 R5171 046 R5171 216
718 R5149 285 R5149 353 R5149 389 R5171 047 R5171 217
719 R5149 286 R5149 354 R5149 390 R5171 048 R5171 218
720 R5149 287 R5149 355 R5149 390A R5171 049 R5171 219
721 R5149 288 R5149 356 R5151 192 R5171 050 R5171 220
722 R5149 289 R5149 357 R5171 001 R5171 051 R5171 221
723 R5149 290 R5149 358 R5171 002 R5171 052 R5171 222
724 R5149 291 R5149 359 R5171 003 R5171 053 R5171 223
725 R5149 292 R5149 360 R5171 011 R5171 054 R5171 224
726 R5149 293 R5149 361 R5171 017 R5171 055 R5171 225
727 R5149 294 R5149 362 R5171 019 R5171 056 R5171 226
728 R5149 295 R5149 363 R5171 020 R5171 057 R5171 227
729 R5149 296 R5149 364 R5171 022 R5171 058 R5171 228
730 R5149 329 R5149 365 R5171 023 R5171 059 R5171 229
731 R5149 330 R5149 366 R5171 024 R5171 060 R5171 230
732 R5149 331 R5149 367 R5171 025 R5171 061 R5171 231
733 R5149 332 R5149 368 R5171 026 R5171 062 R5171 232
734 R5149 333 R5149 369 R5171 027 R5171 063 R5171 233
735 R5149 334 R5149 370 R5171 028 R5171 064 R5171 234
736 R5149 335 R5149 371 R5171 029 R5171 065 R5171 235
737 R5149 336 R5149 372 R5171 030 R5171 066 R5171 236
738 R5149 337 R5149 373 R5171 031 R5171 071 R5171 237
739 R5149 338 R5149 374 R5171 032 R5171 075 R5171 238
740 R5149 339 R5149 375 R5171 033 R5171 076 R5171 239
741 R5149 340 R5149 376 R5171 034 R5171 079 R5171 240
742 R5149 341 R5149 377 R5171 035 R5171 081 R5171 241
743 R5149 342 R5149 378 R5171 036 R5171 083 R5171 242
744 R5149 343 R5149 379 R5171 037 R5171 085 R5171 243
745 R5149 344 R5149 380 R5171 038 R5171 207 R5171 244
746 R5149 345 R5149 381 R5171 039 R5171 209 R5171 245
747 R5149 346 R5149 382 R5171 040 R5171 210 R5171 246
748 R5149 347 R5149 383 R5171 041 R5171 211 R5171 247
749 R5149 348 R5149 384 R5171 042 R5171 212 R5171 248
750 R5149 349 R5149 385 R5171 043 R5171 213 R5171 249
H. B. 739
- 22 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
751 R5171 250 R5171 286 R5171 354 R5171 390 R5171 426
752 R5171 251 R5171 287 R5171 355 R5171 391 R5171 429
753 R5171 252 R5171 288 R5171 356 R5171 392 R5171 431
754 R5171 253 R5171 289 R5171 357 R5171 393 R5171 432
755 R5171 254 R5171 290 R5171 358 R5171 394 R5171 433
756 R5171 255 R5171 291 R5171 359 R5171 395 R5171 434
757 R5171 256 R5171 292 R5171 360 R5171 396 R5171 435
758 R5171 257 R5171 293 R5171 361 R5171 397 R5171 436
759 R5171 258 R5171 294 R5171 362 R5171 398 R5171 437
760 R5171 259 R5171 295 R5171 363 R5171 399 R5171 438
761 R5171 260 R5171 296 R5171 364 R5171 400 R5171 439
762 R5171 261 R5171 297 R5171 365 R5171 401 R5171 440
763 R5171 262 R5171 298 R5171 366 R5171 402 R5171 441
764 R5171 263 R5171 299 R5171 367 R5171 403 R5171 442
765 R5171 264 R5171 300 R5171 368 R5171 404 R5171 443
766 R5171 265 R5171 301 R5171 369 R5171 405 R5171 444
767 R5171 266 R5171 302 R5171 370 R5171 406 R5171 445
768 R5171 267 R5171 303 R5171 371 R5171 407 R5171 446
769 R5171 268 R5171 304 R5171 372 R5171 408 R5171 447
770 R5171 269 R5171 305 R5171 373 R5171 409 R5171 448
771 R5171 270 R5171 306 R5171 374 R5171 410 R5171 449
772 R5171 271 R5171 307 R5171 375 R5171 411 R5171 450
773 R5171 272 R5171 308 R5171 376 R5171 412 R5171 451
774 R5171 273 R5171 331 R5171 377 R5171 413 R5171 452
775 R5171 274 R5171 341 R5171 378 R5171 414 R5171 453
776 R5171 275 R5171 343 R5171 379 R5171 415 R5171 454
777 R5171 276 R5171 344 R5171 380 R5171 416 R5171 455
778 R5171 277 R5171 345 R5171 381 R5171 417 R5171 456
779 R5171 278 R5171 346 R5171 382 R5171 418 R5171 457
780 R5171 279 R5171 347 R5171 383 R5171 419 R5171 458
781 R5171 280 R5171 348 R5171 384 R5171 420 R5171 459
782 R5171 281 R5171 349 R5171 385 R5171 421 R5171 460
783 R5171 282 R5171 350 R5171 386 R5171 422 R5171 461
784 R5171 283 R5171 351 R5171 387 R5171 423 R5171 462
785 R5171 284 R5171 352 R5171 388 R5171 424 R5171 463
786 R5171 285 R5171 353 R5171 389 R5171 425 R5171 464
H. B. 739
- 23 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
787 R5171 465 R5172 118 R5172 167 R5172 203 R5172 239
788 R5171 466 R5172 119 R5172 168 R5172 204 R5172 240
789 R5171 467 R5172 120 R5172 169 R5172 205 R5172 241
790 R5171 468 R5172 121 R5172 170 R5172 206 R5172 242
791 R5171 469 R5172 122 R5172 171 R5172 207 R5172 243
792 R5171 470 R5172 123 R5172 172 R5172 208 R5172 244
793 R5171 471 R5172 124 R5172 173 R5172 209 R5172 245
794 R5171 472 R5172 125 R5172 174 R5172 210 R5172 246
795 R5171 473 R5172 126 R5172 175 R5172 211 R5172 247
796 R5171 480 R5172 127 R5172 176 R5172 212 R5172 248
797 R5172 001A R5172 128 R5172 177 R5172 213 R5172 249
798 R5172 002 R5172 129 R5172 178 R5172 214 R5172 250
799 R5172 004A R5172 130 R5172 179 R5172 215 R5172 251
800 R5172 006 R5172 131 R5172 180 R5172 216 R5172 252
801 R5172 006A R5172 132 R5172 181 R5172 217 R5172 253
802 R5172 007 R5172 133 R5172 182 R5172 218 R5172 254
803 R5172 007A R5172 134 R5172 183 R5172 219 R5172 255
804 R5172 014A R5172 135 R5172 184 R5172 220 R5172 256
805 R5172 015 R5172 136 R5172 185 R5172 221 R5172 258
806 R5172 016 R5172 137 R5172 186 R5172 222 R5172 264
807 R5172 018 R5172 138 R5172 187 R5172 223 R5172 266
808 R5172 022 R5172 139 R5172 188 R5172 224 R5172 268
809 R5172 024 R5172 140 R5172 189 R5172 225 R5172 274
810 R5172 025 R5172 141 R5172 190 R5172 226 R5172 275
811 R5172 106 R5172 142 R5172 191 R5172 227 R5172 276
812 R5172 107 R5172 143 R5172 192 R5172 228 R5172 277
813 R5172 108 R5172 144 R5172 193 R5172 229 R5172 278
814 R5172 109 R5172 145 R5172 194 R5172 230 R5172 279
815 R5172 110 R5172 146 R5172 195 R5172 231 R5172 280
816 R5172 111 R5172 147 R5172 196 R5172 232 R5172 281
817 R5172 112 R5172 151 R5172 197 R5172 233 R5172 282
818 R5172 113 R5172 153 R5172 198 R5172 234 R5172 283
819 R5172 114 R5172 157 R5172 199 R5172 235 R5172 284
820 R5172 115 R5172 161 R5172 200 R5172 236 R5172 285
821 R5172 116 R5172 165 R5172 201 R5172 237 R5172 286
822 R5172 117 R5172 166 R5172 202 R5172 238 R5172 287
H. B. 739
- 24 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
823 R5172 288 R5172 324 R5178 060 R5178 227 R5179 535
824 R5172 289 R5172 325 R5178 070 R5178 228 R5179 536
825 R5172 290 R5172 326 R5178 127 R5178 229 R5179 537
826 R5172 291 R5172 327 R5178 194 R5178 230 R5179 538
827 R5172 292 R5172 327A R5178 195 R5178 231 R5179 539
828 R5172 293 R5172A046 R5178 196 R5178 232 R5179 540
829 R5172 294 R5173 273 R5178 197 R5178 233 R5179 541
830 R5172 295 R5173 274 R5178 198 R5178 234 R5179 542
831 R5172 296 R5173 275 R5178 199 R5178 235 R5179 543
832 R5172 297 R5173 276 R5178 200 R5178 236 R5179 544
833 R5172 298 R5173 277 R5178 201 R5178 237 R5179 545
834 R5172 299 R5173 278 R5178 202 R5178 238 R5179 546
835 R5172 300 R5173 279 R5178 203 R5178 239 R5179 547
836 R5172 301 R5173 280 R5178 204 R5178 240 R5179 548
837 R5172 302 R5173 281 R5178 205 R5178 241 R5179 549
838 R5172 303 R5173 282 R5178 206 R5178 242 R5179 550
839 R5172 304 R5173 283 R5178 207 R5178 243 R5179 551
840 R5172 305 R5173 284 R5178 208 R5178 244 R5179 552
841 R5172 306 R5173 285 R5178 209 R5178 245 R5179 553
842 R5172 307 R5173 286 R5178 210 R5178 246 R5179 554
843 R5172 308 R5173 287 R5178 211 R5178 247 R5179 555
844 R5172 309 R5173 288 R5178 212 R5178 248 R5179 556
845 R5172 310 R5173 289 R5178 213 R5178 249 R5179 557
846 R5172 311 R5173 290 R5178 214 R5178 250 R5179 558
847 R5172 312 R5173 291 R5178 215 R5178 251 R5179 559
848 R5172 313 R5176 049A R5178 216 R5178 252 R5179 560
849 R5172 314 R5177 012 R5178 217 R5178 253 R5179 561
850 R5172 315 R5177 033 R5178 218 R5178 254 R5179 562
851 R5172 316 R5177 034 R5178 219 R5178 255 R5179 563
852 R5172 317 R5178 004 R5178 220 R5178 256 R5179 564
853 R5172 318 R5178 005 R5178 221 R5178 257 R5179 565
854 R5172 319 R5178 006 R5178 222 R5178 258 R5179 566
855 R5172 320 R5178 007 R5178 223 R5178 259 R5179 567
856 R5172 321 R5178 009 R5178 224 R5178 260 R5179 568
857 R5172 322 R5178 010 R5178 225 R5178 261 R5179 569
858 R5172 323 R5178 011 R5178 226 R5178 262 R5179 570
H. B. 739
- 25 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
859 R5179 571 R5179 608 R5179 644 R5179 680 R5179 716
860 R5179 572 R5179 609 R5179 645 R5179 681 R5179 717
861 R5179 573 R5179 610 R5179 646 R5179 682 R5179 718
862 R5179 574 R5179 611 R5179 647 R5179 683 R5179 719
863 R5179 575 R5179 612 R5179 648 R5179 684 R5179 720
864 R5179 576 R5179 613 R5179 649 R5179 685 R5179 721
865 R5179 577 R5179 614 R5179 650 R5179 686 R5179 722
866 R5179 578 R5179 615 R5179 651 R5179 687 R5179 723
867 R5179 579 R5179 616 R5179 652 R5179 688 R5179 724
868 R5179 580 R5179 617 R5179 653 R5179 689 R5179 725
869 R5179 581 R5179 618 R5179 654 R5179 690 R5179 726
870 R5179 583 R5179 619 R5179 655 R5179 691 R5179 727
871 R5179 584 R5179 620 R5179 656 R5179 692 R5179 728
872 R5179 585 R5179 621 R5179 657 R5179 693 R5179 729
873 R5179 586 R5179 622 R5179 658 R5179 694 R5179 730
874 R5179 587 R5179 623 R5179 659 R5179 695 R5179 731
875 R5179 588 R5179 624 R5179 660 R5179 696 R5179 732
876 R5179 589 R5179 625 R5179 661 R5179 697 R5179 733
877 R5179 590 R5179 626 R5179 662 R5179 698 R5179 734
878 R5179 591 R5179 627 R5179 663 R5179 699 R5179 735
879 R5179 592 R5179 628 R5179 664 R5179 700 R5179 736
880 R5179 593 R5179 629 R5179 665 R5179 701 R5179 737
881 R5179 594 R5179 630 R5179 666 R5179 702 R5180 001A
882 R5179 595 R5179 631 R5179 667 R5179 703 R5180 010
883 R5179 596 R5179 632 R5179 668 R5179 704 R5180 188
884 R5179 597 R5179 633 R5179 669 R5179 705 R5180 189
885 R5179 598 R5179 634 R5179 670 R5179 706 R5180 190
886 R5179 599 R5179 635 R5179 671 R5179 707 R5180 191
887 R5179 600 R5179 636 R5179 672 R5179 708 R5180 192
888 R5179 601 R5179 637 R5179 673 R5179 709 R5180 193
889 R5179 602 R5179 638 R5179 674 R5179 710 R5180 194
890 R5179 603 R5179 639 R5179 675 R5179 711 R5180 195
891 R5179 604 R5179 640 R5179 676 R5179 712 R5180 196
892 R5179 605 R5179 641 R5179 677 R5179 713 R5180 197
893 R5179 606 R5179 642 R5179 678 R5179 714 R5181 003
894 R5179 607 R5179 643 R5179 679 R5179 715 R5181 004
H. B. 739
- 26 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
895 R5181 005 R5181 334 R5181 370 R5181 553 R5205 143
896 R5181 007 R5181 335 R5181 511 R5181 554 R5205 144
897 R5181 012 R5181 336 R5181 512 R5181 555 R5205 145
898 R5181 016 R5181 337 R5181 520 R5181 556 R5205 146
899 R5181 020 R5181 338 R5181 521 R5181 557 R5205 147
900 R5181 024 R5181 339 R5181 522 R5181 558 R5205 148
901 R5181 026 R5181 340 R5181 523 R5181 559 R5205 149
902 R5181 074 R5181 341 R5181 524 R5181 560 R5205 150
903 R5181 306 R5181 342 R5181 525 R5181 561 R5205 151
904 R5181 307 R5181 343 R5181 526 R5181 562 R5205 152
905 R5181 308 R5181 344 R5181 527 R5181 563 R5205 153
906 R5181 309 R5181 345 R5181 528 R5181 564 R5205 154
907 R5181 310 R5181 346 R5181 529 R5181 565 R5205 155
908 R5181 311 R5181 347 R5181 530 R5181 566 R5205 156
909 R5181 312 R5181 348 R5181 531 R5181 567 R5205 157
910 R5181 313 R5181 349 R5181 532 R5181 568 R5205 158
911 R5181 314 R5181 350 R5181 533 R5181 569 R5205 159
912 R5181 315 R5181 351 R5181 534 R5181 570 R5205 160
913 R5181 316 R5181 352 R5181 535 R5181 571 R5205 161
914 R5181 317 R5181 353 R5181 536 R5181 572 R5205 162
915 R5181 318 R5181 354 R5181 537 R5181 573 R5205 163
916 R5181 319 R5181 355 R5181 538 R5181 574 R5205 164
917 R5181 320 R5181 356 R5181 539 R5181 575 R5205 165
918 R5181 321 R5181 357 R5181 540 R5181 587 R5205 166
919 R5181 322 R5181 358 R5181 541 R5181 588 R5205 167
920 R5181 323 R5181 359 R5181 542 R5181 589 R5205 168
921 R5181 324 R5181 360 R5181 543 R5181 590 R5205 169
922 R5181 325 R5181 361 R5181 544 R5204 009 R5205 170
923 R5181 326 R5181 362 R5181 545 R5204 030 R5205 171
924 R5181 327 R5181 363 R5181 546 R5204 061 R5205 172
925 R5181 328 R5181 364 R5181 547 R5205 014 R5205 173
926 R5181 329 R5181 365 R5181 548 R5205 022 R5205 175
927 R5181 330 R5181 366 R5181 549 R5205 139 R5205 439
928 R5181 331 R5181 367 R5181 550 R5205 140 R5205 473
929 R5181 332 R5181 368 R5181 551 R5205 141 R5208 001
930 R5181 333 R5181 369 R5181 552 R5205 142 R5208 001A
H. B. 739
- 27 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
931 R5208 002 R7005 125 R7005 186 R7005 223 R7005 260
932 R5208 019 R7005 126 R7005 187 R7005 224 R7005 261
933 R5208 026 R7005 127 R7005 188 R7005 225 R7005 262
934 R5208 028 R7005 128 R7005 189 R7005 226 R7005 263
935 R7004 001 R7005 133 R7005 190 R7005 227 R7005 264
936 R7004 266 R7005 135 R7005 191 R7005 228 R7005 265
937 R7004 618 R7005 148 R7005 192 R7005 229 R7005 266
938 R7004 620 R7005 149 R7005 193 R7005 230 R7005 267
939 R7004 621 R7005 150 R7005 194 R7005 231 R7005 268
940 R7004 622 R7005 151 R7005 195 R7005 232 R7005 269
941 R7004 624 R7005 153 R7005 196 R7005 233 R7005 270
942 R7004 628 R7005 154 R7005 197 R7005 234 R7005 271
943 R7004 630 R7005 155 R7005 198 R7005 235 R7005 272
944 R7004 631 R7005 156 R7005 199 R7005 236 R7005 273
945 R7004 632 R7005 157 R7005 200 R7005 237 R7005 274
946 R7004 633 R7005 158 R7005 201 R7005 238 R7005 275
947 R7004 634 R7005 159 R7005 202 R7005 239 R7005 276
948 R7004 636 R7005 160 R7005 203 R7005 240 R7005 277
949 R7005 001 R7005 161 R7005 204 R7005 241 R7005 278
950 R7005 003 R7005 162 R7005 205 R7005 242 R7005 280
951 R7005 004A R7005 163 R7005 206 R7005 243 R7005 282
952 R7005 004C R7005 164 R7005 207 R7005 244 R7005 283
953 R7005 019 R7005 165 R7005 208 R7005 245 R7005 284
954 R7005 021 R7005 166 R7005 210 R7005 246 R7005 285
955 R7005 022 R7005 167 R7005 211 R7005 247 R7005 286
956 R7005 026 R7005 168 R7005 212 R7005 248 R7005 287
957 R7005 027 R7005 169 R7005 213 R7005 249 R7005 288
958 R7005 028 R7005 170 R7005 214 R7005 250 R7005 289
959 R7005 093 R7005 171 R7005 215 R7005 251 R7005 290
960 R7005 095 R7005 172 R7005 216 R7005 252 R7005 291
961 R7005 117 R7005 174 R7005 217 R7005 253 R7005 292
962 R7005 120 R7005 176 R7005 218 R7005 254 R7005 293
963 R7005 121 R7005 182 R7005 219 R7005 255 R7005 294
964 R7005 122 R7005 183 R7005 220 R7005 256 R7005 295
965 R7005 123 R7005 184 R7005 221 R7005 257 R7005 296
966 R7005 124 R7005 185 R7005 222 R7005 258 R7005 297
H. B. 739
- 28 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
967 R7005 298 R7005 336 R7005 763 R7005 799 R7005 835
968 R7005 299 R7005 337 R7005 764 R7005 800 R7005 836
969 R7005 300 R7005 338 R7005 765 R7005 801 R7005 837
970 R7005 301 R7005 339 R7005 766 R7005 802 R7005 838
971 R7005 302 R7005 340 R7005 767 R7005 803 R7005 839
972 R7005 303 R7005 341 R7005 768 R7005 804 R7005 840
973 R7005 304 R7005 342 R7005 769 R7005 805 R7005 841
974 R7005 306 R7005 343 R7005 770 R7005 806 R7005 842
975 R7005 308 R7005 344 R7005 771 R7005 807 R7005 843
976 R7005 309 R7005 345 R7005 772 R7005 808 R7005 844
977 R7005 310 R7005 352 R7005 773 R7005 809 R7005 846
978 R7005 311 R7005 354 R7005 774 R7005 810 R7005 847
979 R7005 312 R7005 356 R7005 775 R7005 811 R7005 848
980 R7005 313 R7005 357 R7005 776 R7005 812 R7005 849
981 R7005 314 R7005 361 R7005 777 R7005 813 R7005 850
982 R7005 315 R7005 363 R7005 778 R7005 814 R7005 851
983 R7005 316 R7005 374 R7005 779 R7005 815 R7005 852
984 R7005 317 R7005 375 R7005 780 R7005 816 R7005 853
985 R7005 318 R7005 376 R7005 781 R7005 817 R7005 854
986 R7005 319 R7005 526 R7005 782 R7005 818 R7005 855
987 R7005 320 R7005 570 R7005 783 R7005 819 R7005 856
988 R7005 321 R7005 588 R7005 784 R7005 820 R7005 857
989 R7005 322 R7005 749 R7005 785 R7005 821 R7005 859
990 R7005 323 R7005 750 R7005 786 R7005 822 R7005 860
991 R7005 324 R7005 751 R7005 787 R7005 823 R7006 004C
992 R7005 325 R7005 752 R7005 788 R7005 824 R7006 006
993 R7005 326 R7005 753 R7005 789 R7005 825 R7006 010
994 R7005 327 R7005 754 R7005 790 R7005 826 R7006 013
995 R7005 328 R7005 755 R7005 791 R7005 827 R7006 015
996 R7005 329 R7005 756 R7005 792 R7005 828 R7006 017
997 R7005 330 R7005 757 R7005 793 R7005 829 R7006 022
998 R7005 331 R7005 758 R7005 794 R7005 830 R7006 023
999 R7005 332 R7005 759 R7005 795 R7005 831 R7006 024
1000 R7005 333 R7005 760 R7005 796 R7005 832 R7006 025
1001 R7005 334 R7005 761 R7005 797 R7005 833 R7006 026
1002 R7005 335 R7005 762 R7005 798 R7005 834 R7006 027
H. B. 739
- 29 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1003 R7006 028 R7006 084 R7006 120 R7006 210 R7011 014B
1004 R7006 029 R7006 085 R7006 121 R7006 211 R7011 024
1005 R7006 030 R7006 086 R7006 122 R7006 212 R7011 025
1006 R7006 031 R7006 087 R7006 123 R7006 213 R7011 026
1007 R7006 032 R7006 088 R7006 124 R7007 001 R7011 027
1008 R7006 033 R7006 089 R7006 125 R7007 004 R7011 028
1009 R7006 034 R7006 090 R7006 126 R7008 003 R7011 029
1010 R7006 035 R7006 091 R7006 127 R7008 004 R7011 030
1011 R7006 036 R7006 092 R7006 128 R7008 019 R7011 031
1012 R7006 037 R7006 093 R7006 129 R7008 029 R7011 032
1013 R7006 038 R7006 094 R7006 130 R7008 031 R7011 033
1014 R7006 042 R7006 095 R7006 131 R7008 033 R7011 034
1015 R7006 060 R7006 096 R7006 132 R7008 035 R7011 035
1016 R7006 061 R7006 097 R7006 133 R7008 039 R7011 036
1017 R7006 062 R7006 098 R7006 134 R7008 043 R7011 037
1018 R7006 063 R7006 099 R7006 135 R7008 044 R7011 040
1019 R7006 064 R7006 100 R7006 136 R7008 045 R7011 041
1020 R7006 065 R7006 101 R7006 137 R7008 046 R7011 042
1021 R7006 066 R7006 102 R7006 138 R7008 047 R7011 046
1022 R7006 067 R7006 103 R7006 139 R7008 048 R7011 047
1023 R7006 068 R7006 104 R7006 140 R7008 049 R7011 048
1024 R7006 069 R7006 105 R7006 141 R7008 050 R7011 050
1025 R7006 070 R7006 106 R7006 142 R7008 051 R7011 051
1026 R7006 071 R7006 107 R7006 149 R7008 052 R7011 053
1027 R7006 072 R7006 108 R7006 198 R7008 053 R7011 055
1028 R7006 073 R7006 109 R7006 199 R7008 054 R7011 057
1029 R7006 074 R7006 110 R7006 200 R7008 060 R7011 059
1030 R7006 075 R7006 111 R7006 201 R7008 061 R7011 061
1031 R7006 076 R7006 112 R7006 202 R7008 062 R7011 062
1032 R7006 077 R7006 113 R7006 203 R7008 063 R7011 064
1033 R7006 078 R7006 114 R7006 204 R7008 064 R7011 066
1034 R7006 079 R7006 115 R7006 205 R7008 066 R7011 067
1035 R7006 080 R7006 116 R7006 206 R7009 001 R7011 068
1036 R7006 081 R7006 117 R7006 207 R7009 067 R7011 069
1037 R7006 082 R7006 118 R7006 208 R7011 002D R7011 070
1038 R7006 083 R7006 119 R7006 209 R7011 011 R7011 071
H. B. 739
- 30 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1039 R7011 072 R7012A005 R7027 031 R7028 095 R7028 132
1040 R7011 073 R7012A006 R7027 075 R7028 096 R7028 133
1041 R7011 074 R7012A008 R7027 092 R7028 097 R7028 134
1042 R7011 156 R7012A013 R7027 157 R7028 098 R7028 135
1043 R7011 157 R7012A015 R7027 208 R7028 099 R7028 136
1044 R7012 002A R7012A017 R7027 210 R7028 100 R7028 137
1045 R7012 002B R7012A018 R7027 218 R7028 101 R7028 138
1046 R7012 002C R7012A019 R7027 222 R7028 102 R7028 139
1047 R7012 002D R7012A020 R7027 228 R7028 103 R7028 140
1048 R7012 014 R7012A022 R7027 229 R7028 104 R7028 141
1049 R7012 015 R7012A023 R7028 005 R7028 105 R7028 142
1050 R7012 016 R7012A024 R7028 006 R7028 106 R7028 200
1051 R7012 027 R7012A025 R7028 007 R7028 107 R7028 201
1052 R7012 028 R7012A026 R7028 009 R7028 108 R7028 202
1053 R7012 029 R7012A027 R7028 010 R7028 109 R7028 203
1054 R7012 029A R7012A029 R7028 022 R7028 110 R7028 204
1055 R7012 029B R7012A030 R7028 075 R7028 111 R7028 205
1056 R7012 030A R7012A031 R7028 076 R7028 112 R7028 206
1057 R7012 030B R7012A032 R7028 077 R7028 113 R7028 207
1058 R7012 030C R7012A033 R7028 078 R7028 114 R7028 208
1059 R7012 030D R7012A034 R7028 079 R7028 115 R7028 209
1060 R7012 031 R7012A035 R7028 080 R7028 116 R7028 210
1061 R7012 033 R7012A036 R7028 081 R7028 117 R7028 211
1062 R7012 034 R7012A037 R7028 082 R7028 118 R7028 212
1063 R7012 037 R7027 001 R7028 083 R7028 119 R7028 213
1064 R7012 043 R7027 001A R7028 084 R7028 120 R7028 214
1065 R7012 052 R7027 002 R7028 085 R7028 122 R7028 215
1066 R7012 053 R7027 002A R7028 086 R7028 123 R7028 216
1067 R7012 056 R7027 003 R7028 087 R7028 124 R7028 217
1068 R7012 070 R7027 003X R7028 088 R7028 125 R7028 218
1069 R7012 083 R7027 010A R7028 089 R7028 126 R7028 219
1070 R7012 106 R7027 011 R7028 090 R7028 127 R7028 220
1071 R7012A001 R7027 013 R7028 091 R7028 128 R7028 221
1072 R7012A002 R7027 014 R7028 092 R7028 129 R7028 222
1073 R7012A003A R7027 026 R7028 093 R7028 130 R7028 223
1074 R7012A004 R7027 027 R7028 094 R7028 131 R7028 224
H. B. 739
- 31 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1075 R7028 225 R7028A060A R7028A123 R7029 023 R7029 069
1076 R7028 226 R7028A061 R7028A124 R7029 024 R7029 070
1077 R7028 227 R7028A062 R7028A125 R7029 025 R7029 071
1078 R7028 227A R7028A063 R7028A126 R7029 033 R7029 072
1079 R7028A001 R7028A064 R7028A127 R7029 034 R7029 073
1080 R7028A004 R7028A065 R7028A128 R7029 035 R7029 074
1081 R7028A007 R7028A065A R7028A143 R7029 036 R7029 075
1082 R7028A009 R7028A066 R7028A150 R7029 037 R7029 077
1083 R7028A011 R7028A066A R7028A159 R7029 038 R7029 078
1084 R7028A013 R7028A067 R7028A160 R7029 039 R7029 079
1085 R7028A015 R7028A068 R7028A171 R7029 040 R7029 080
1086 R7028A016 R7028A069 R7028A173 R7029 041 R7029 081
1087 R7028A017 R7028A070 R7028A177 R7029 042 R7029 082
1088 R7028A018 R7028A071 R7028A179 R7029 043 R7029 083
1089 R7028A024 R7028A073 R7028A181 R7029 044 R7029 084
1090 R7028A025 R7028A074 R7028A185 R7029 045 R7029 085
1091 R7028A027 R7028A075 R7028A187 R7029 046 R7029 086
1092 R7028A029 R7028A076 R7029 001 R7029 047 R7029 087
1093 R7028A030 R7028A077 R7029 003 R7029 048 R7029 088
1094 R7028A031 R7028A078 R7029 004 R7029 049 R7029 089
1095 R7028A032 R7028A079 R7029 005 R7029 050 R7029 090
1096 R7028A033 R7028A080 R7029 006 R7029 051 R7029 091
1097 R7028A034 R7028A083 R7029 007 R7029 054 R7029 092
1098 R7028A035 R7028A085 R7029 008 R7029 055 R7029 093
1099 R7028A036 R7028A086 R7029 009 R7029 056 R7029 094
1100 R7028A037 R7028A086A R7029 010 R7029 057 R7029 103
1101 R7028A038 R7028A087 R7029 011 R7029 059 R7029 106
1102 R7028A039 R7028A087A R7029 013 R7029 060 R7029 110
1103 R7028A048 R7028A087B R7029 014 R7029 061 R7029 113
1104 R7028A055 R7028A087C R7029 016 R7029 062 R7029 115
1105 R7028A056 R7028A088 R7029 017 R7029 063 R7029 116
1106 R7028A057 R7028A091 R7029 018 R7029 064 R7029 117
1107 R7028A058 R7028A092 R7029 019 R7029 065 R7029 118
1108 R7028A058A R7028A119 R7029 020 R7029 066 R7029 119
1109 R7028A059 R7028A120 R7029 021 R7029 067 R7029 120
1110 R7028A060 R7028A121 R7029 022 R7029 068 R7029 121
H. B. 739
- 32 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1111 R7029 122 R7029 159 R7029 319 R7029 356 R7029 393
1112 R7029 123 R7029 160 R7029 320 R7029 357 R7029 394
1113 R7029 124 R7029 161 R7029 321 R7029 358 R7029 395
1114 R7029 125 R7029 162 R7029 322 R7029 359 R7029 396
1115 R7029 126 R7029 163 R7029 323 R7029 361 R7029 397
1116 R7029 127 R7029 164 R7029 324 R7029 362 R7029 399
1117 R7029 128 R7029 165 R7029 325 R7029 363 R7029 400
1118 R7029 129 R7029 166 R7029 326 R7029 364 R7029 401
1119 R7029 130 R7029 252 R7029 327 R7029 365 R7029 402
1120 R7029 131 R7029 291 R7029 328 R7029 366 R7029 403
1121 R7029 132 R7029 292 R7029 329 R7029 367 R7029 404
1122 R7029 133 R7029 293 R7029 330 R7029 368 R7029 405
1123 R7029 134 R7029 294 R7029 331 R7029 369 R7029 406
1124 R7029 135 R7029 295 R7029 332 R7029 370 R7029 407
1125 R7029 136 R7029 296 R7029 333 R7029 371 R7029 408
1126 R7029 137 R7029 297 R7029 334 R7029 372 R7029 409
1127 R7029 138 R7029 298 R7029 335 R7029 373 R7029 410
1128 R7029 139 R7029 299 R7029 336 R7029 374 R7029 411
1129 R7029 140 R7029 300 R7029 338 R7029 375 R7029 412
1130 R7029 141 R7029 301 R7029 339 R7029 376 R7029 413
1131 R7029 142 R7029 302 R7029 340 R7029 377 R7029 414
1132 R7029 143 R7029 303 R7029 341 R7029 378 R7029 415
1133 R7029 144 R7029 304 R7029 342 R7029 379 R7029 416
1134 R7029 145 R7029 305 R7029 343 R7029 380 R7029 417
1135 R7029 146 R7029 307 R7029 344 R7029 381 R7029 418
1136 R7029 147 R7029 308 R7029 345 R7029 382 R7029 419
1137 R7029 148 R7029 309 R7029 346 R7029 383 R7029 420
1138 R7029 149 R7029 310 R7029 347 R7029 384 R7029 421
1139 R7029 150 R7029 311 R7029 348 R7029 385 R7029 422
1140 R7029 151 R7029 312 R7029 349 R7029 386 R7029 423
1141 R7029 152 R7029 313 R7029 350 R7029 387 R7029 424
1142 R7029 153 R7029 314 R7029 351 R7029 388 R7029 425
1143 R7029 154 R7029 315 R7029 352 R7029 389 R7029 426
1144 R7029 155 R7029 316 R7029 353 R7029 390 R7029 427
1145 R7029 157 R7029 317 R7029 354 R7029 391 R7029 428
1146 R7029 158 R7029 318 R7029 355 R7029 392 R7029 429
H. B. 739
- 33 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1147 R7029 430 R7031 416 R7031 465 R7035 024 R7036 058
1148 R7029 431 R7031 417 R7031 466 R7035 025 R7036 060
1149 R7029 432 R7031 418 R7031 467 R7035 039 R7036 062
1150 R7029 433 R7031 419 R7032 002B R7035 041 R7036 076
1151 R7029 434 R7031 420 R7032 006 R7035 047 R7036 077
1152 R7029 451 R7031 421 R7032 016 R7035 049 R7036 079
1153 R7029 452 R7031 422 R7032 018 R7035 051 R7036 080
1154 R7029 453 R7031 423 R7032 508 R7035 056 R7036 082
1155 R7031 005 R7031 424 R7032 510 R7035 060 R7036 084
1156 R7031 007 R7031 425 R7033 090 R7035 061 R7036 087
1157 R7031 279 R7031 426 R7033 102 R7035 062 R7036 088
1158 R7031 280 R7031 427 R7033 104 R7035 065 R7036 089
1159 R7031 391 R7031 428 R7033 105 R7035 067 R7036 090
1160 R7031 393 R7031 429 R7033 106 R7035 069 R7036 091
1161 R7031 394 R7031 430 R7033 107 R7035 071 R7036 092
1162 R7031 395 R7031 431 R7033 122 R7035 073 R7036 093
1163 R7031 396 R7031 432 R7033 126 R7035 076 R7036 094
1164 R7031 397 R7031 443 R7033 195 R7035 078 R7036 095
1165 R7031 398 R7031 447 R7033 197 R7035 080 R7036 096
1166 R7031 399 R7031 448 R7033 225 R7035 086 R7036 097
1167 R7031 400 R7031 449 R7033 252 R7036 002 R7036 099
1168 R7031 401 R7031 450 R7033 272 R7036 003 R7036 100
1169 R7031 402 R7031 451 R7033 276 R7036 003A R7036A001
1170 R7031 403 R7031 452 R7033 277 R7036 003F R7036A002
1171 R7031 404 R7031 453 R7033 278 R7036 004A R7036A003
1172 R7031 405 R7031 454 R7033 281 R7036 005 R7036A004
1173 R7031 406 R7031 455 R7033 287 R7036 013 R7036A005
1174 R7031 407 R7031 456 R7033 290 R7036 019 R7036A006
1175 R7031 408 R7031 457 R7033 309 R7036 031 R7036A007
1176 R7031 409 R7031 458 R7033 310 R7036 032 R7036A008
1177 R7031 410 R7031 459 R7033 311 R7036 033 R7036A009
1178 R7031 411 R7031 460 R7033 315 R7036 034 R7036A010
1179 R7031 412 R7031 461 R7035 007 R7036 035 R7036A011
1180 R7031 413 R7031 462 R7035 009 R7036 036 R7036A012
1181 R7031 414 R7031 463 R7035 020 R7036 050 R7036A013
1182 R7031 415 R7031 464 R7035 023 R7036 056 R7036A015
H. B. 739
- 34 -

25 LC 47 3537/AP
1183 R7036A016 R7037 002 R7049 009 R7049 015
1184 R7036A017 R7049 003 R7049 013 R7049 017
H. B. 739
- 35 -